Hawaii statutes.
[§431N-1] Findings and purpose.
(a) The legislature finds that despite the fact that Hawaii has the only
statutorily mandated prepaid health care program in the country, as well as a
broad-based medicaid program which provides an array of medical benefits to
Hawaii's lowest income level residents, there remain in the State uninsured
"gap group individuals". Available statistics consistently reveal
that an estimated five per cent of the civilian population of this State, or
50,000 individuals, lack any form of medical insurance whatsoever and are
therefore limited in access to medical care.

(b) These "gap group individuals"
are characterized by one or more of the following conditions or factors
contributing to lack of insurance or "medical indigency":

(1) They have too much income or too many assets to
qualify for medicaid, but too little to afford private insurance;

(2) They do not qualify for prepaid health care
insurance coverage through employment;

(3) They choose not to obtain health insurance; or

(4) They are dependents, primarily children of
insureds who are not covered by their parent's, guardian's, or spouse's
policies.

(c) The legislature further finds that it is a
matter of compelling public interest to provide for the health and well- being
of all the people of this State. This is also consistent with the health
provisions of the Hawaii State Planning Act as set forth in section
226-20(a)(1), which establish as an objective the "fulfillment of basic
individual health needs of the general public." This objective is
construed to include access to basic health insurance coverage. To responsibly
carry out this objective, it is therefore appropriate that the legislature use
innovative means to ensure that all residents, regardless of age, income,
employment status, or any other factor, have access to health insurance
coverage which will provide basic medical services necessary to sustain a
healthy life.

(d) The purpose of this chapter is to
establish a program within the department of health, funded through legislative
appropriations, to ensure basic health insurance coverage is available for
Hawaii residents who are medically uninsured and who are defined in section
431N-2 as "gap group individuals". [L 1989, c 378, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next